Hawaii, session 2026, HB364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 143, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new sections to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§143-A  Cat sterilization; cat breeding permit; requirements.  (a)  It shall be unlawful for any person to own a cat over the age of three months unless the cat is surgically sterilized. (b)  A cat may be exempted from the sterilization requirement under subsection (a) if: (1)  A duly licensed veterinarian certifies in writing that the cat is not suitable for sterilization due to health or age considerations; provided that the certification shall be applicable for a period of up to one year, as specified in writing by the veterinarian, and contain the veterinarian's license number; (2)  Arrangements have been made to sterilize the cat within sixty days after the date the person assumes ownership over the cat and the cat is sterilized in that sixty-day period; or (3)  A breeding permit is obtained in accordance with this section. (c)  Each county animal control authority may administer and enforce a permit program to allow the responsible breeding of cats consistent with local ordinances and the minimum requirements identified in this section.  A cat breeding permit program administered pursuant to this section shall, at a minimum: (1)  Prohibit the sale or adoption of any offspring of a breeding cat until the offspring has: (A)  Reached the age of at least eight weeks; and (B)  Been immunized against common diseases by a licensed veterinarian; provided that the surrender of any offspring of a breeding cat to an animal control authority shall be prohibited until the offspring has reached the age of at least eight weeks; (2)  Require any permit holder advertising to the public the availability of any cat for adoption or sale to: (A)  Prominently display the permit number in any publications in which the permit holder advertises; and (B)  Provide the permit number to any person adopting or purchasing any cat bred by the permit holder; and (3)  Require one permit per breeding cat. (d)  To obtain a cat breeding permit pursuant to this section, an applicant shall, at a minimum: (1)  Pay an annual fee of $250 per breeding cat, to be retained by the animal control authority; and (2)  Provide proof to the appropriate animal control authority administering the permit program that: (A)  The breeding cat covered by the permit: (i)  Is implanted with a microchip, in accordance with section 143-2; (ii)  Is fully contained on the owner's property or under a person's direct control, such as by leash, if off the owner's property; (iii)  Is not genetically similar to any cat the breeding cat is being bred with; (iv)  Is up-to-date on prophylactic health care, including core cat vaccines; (v)  Has tested negative for feline leukemia and feline immunodeficiency virus; (vi)  Is at least eighteen months of age and less than seven years of age; and (vii)  For a female cat, has not had more than one litter a year and less than four litters in its lifetime; and (B)  The applicant does not use a third party for sale or transfer of cats and kittens. (e) No person convicted of cruelty to animals under sections 711-1108.5, 711‑1109, or 711-1109.7 shall be issued a cat breeding permit under this section. (f)  Any person violating this section shall be fined no less than $500 and no more than $1,000 per violation per cat. (g)  This section shall not apply to cats brought into the State exclusively for the purpose of entering them in a cat show or exhibition and not allowed to run at large. §143-B  Spay and neuter special fund.  (a) There is established in the state treasury the spay and neuter special fund, to be administered by the department of budget and finance.   Moneys received by the department of budget and finance from: (1)  State income tax refund designations to the special fund pursuant to section 235-   ; (2)  Revenue generated by the fundraising fees from special number plates pursuant to section 249-   ; (3)  Fees collected pursuant to section 143-A(d)(1); and (4)  Legislative appropriations, private gifts or donations, and other sources, shall be deposited into the special fund. All interest earned or accrued on moneys deposited into the special fund shall become part of the special fund. (b)  Moneys in the special fund shall be expended to reduce pet overpopulation, including the free-roaming cat population, by providing spaying and neutering surgery and associated veterinary care; provided that spayed or neutered animals are not re-released into the environment and the uses and expenditures of moneys in the special fund shall follow the eligibility criteria established by the advisory committee established under subsection (c). (c)   There is established an advisory committee to assist the department of budget and finance in establishing the eligibility criteria and procedures for disbursements from the special fund. The advisory committee shall consist of seven members to be selected by the director of finance and shall include the following: (1)   One representative of the department of budget and finance; (2)  One representative of the department of land and natural resources; (3)  One representative of the department of health; (4)   One representative of the Hawaii Animal Welfare Association or its successor organization, who shall be invited to participate; (5)   At least one representative of the Hawaii Veterinary Medical Association, who shall be invited to participate; and (6)   At least one member from a Hawaii-based, private, non-profit animal-welfare organization, who shall be invited to participate. The advisory committee shall select a chairperson from among its members.    All members of the advisory committee shall be residents of the State and shall serve three-year terms. All members shall have an active interest in humanely reducing pet overpopulation and reducing the number of free-roaming cats in the State. (d)   The advisory committee shall submit an annual report to the director of finance, in a form prescribed by the director, that identifies the total amount of funds that were disbursed from the special fund during the previous fiscal year and the amount of funds to be carried over to the next fiscal year.  The advisory committee shall submit the report to the director of finance within ninety days after the close of each fiscal year. (e)  The members of the advisory committee shall serve without pay but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in carrying out their duties." SECTION 2.  Chapter 235, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§235-     Income check-off authorized; spaying and neutering of animals. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any individual whose state income tax refund for any taxable year is $5 or more may designate $5 of the refund to be deposited into the spay and neuter special fund established by section 143-B, when submitting a state income tax return to the department.  In the case of a joint return of a married couple having a state income tax refund of $10 or more, each spouse may designate that $5 be deposited into the special fund.  The director of taxation shall revise the individual state income tax form to allow the designation of contributions to the fund on the face of the tax return and immediately above the signature lines.  If no designation was made on the original tax return when filed, a designation may be made by the individual on an amended return filed within twenty months and ten days after the due date for the original return for that taxable year. A designation once made, whether by an original or amended return, shall not be revoked." SECTION 3. Chapter 249, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§249-     Special number plates; spay and neuter special fund; authorized.  (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the director of finance shall issue to any registered owner of a motor vehicle, who is a resident of the State, upon completed application and payment of the required fees, a special number plate for the registered owner's motor vehicle supporting the spay and neuter special fund. (b)  The director of finance of the city and county of Honolulu, in consultation with the directors of finance of the counties of Hawaii, Kauai, and Maui; chiefs of police of the city and county of Honolulu and the counties of Hawaii, Kauai, and Maui; and advisory committee of the spay and neuter special fund, shall establish a special number plate design that: (1)  Contains words, images, or both, that indicate the special number plate is issued to recognize the spaying and neutering of animals; (2)  Is similar in shape and size to the uniform state number plate prescribed by law; and (3)  Does not obstruct the visibility of the numbers or letters or any other information that is required by law to be on a number plate and is readily identifiable and distinguishable under actual traffic conditions. (c)  The special number plate design shall not: (1)  Infringe upon or otherwise violate any trademark, trade name, service mark, copyright, or other proprietary or property right; (2)  Represent any obscene or degrading image, idea, word, or phrase; (3)  Advertise or endorse a product, brand, or service that is provided for sale; (4)  Promote any religious belief; or (5)  Promote any philosophy based on prejudice or that is contrary to state civil rights laws. (d)  Each special number plate shall be securely fastened to the motor vehicle in lieu of the uniform state number plate. (e)  The director of finance shall charge a special number plate fee at least equal to the county's cost of providing the special number plate and administrative costs, if any, plus a fundraising fee to be determined by the director of finance in consultation with the advisory committee of the spay and neuter special fund.  The fundraising fee shall be in addition to any other state or county fees collected for a motor vehicle registration or license plate. (f)  The director of finance may charge an additional fundraising fee of the same or a different amount as the fundraising fee established pursuant to subsection (e), for the renewal of a special number plate. If an additional fundraising fee is implemented pursuant to this subsection, the director of finance shall revoke the special number plate of any registered owner of a motor vehicle who fails to pay the additional fundraising fee imposed by this subsection. (g)  The revenue generated by the fundraising fees, or a portion of the revenue generated by the fundraising fees as determined by the director of finance, shall be deposited into the spay and neuter special fund established by section 143-B. (h)  The director of finance may revoke all special number plates issued pursuant to this section if the total number of registered owners of motor vehicles that obtain the special number plates is less than one hundred fifty within three years of issuance of the first special number plate. (i)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to any plates issued pursuant to section 249-9.2 or 249-9.5. (j)  As used in this section, unless a different meaning appears from the context, "special number plate" means a license plate that recognizes the spaying and neutering of animals." SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to be deposited into the spay and neuter special fund established by section 143-B, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the spay and neuter special fund established by section 143-B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the sum of $500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to reduce pet overpopulation, including the free-roaming cat population, by providing spaying and neutering surgery and associated veterinary care. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of budget and finance for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  In codifying the new sections added by section 1 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 7.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 8.  This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2026; provided that: (1)  Section 2 of this Act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024; and (2)  Sections 4 and 5 of this Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________